New York, session 2025-2026, A4920.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 3204-a 2 to read as follows: 3 § 3204-a. Three King's day school holiday. 1. The sixth day of Janu- 4 ary, commonly known as Three King's day, is hereby made and declared to 5 be a holiday for all public schools in a qualified school district. 6 2. A qualified school district, for purposes of this section, shall 7 mean a city school district of a city having a population of one million 8 or more inhabitants. 9 3. The school authorities of a qualified school district are hereby 10 authorized and directed to cause all public schools within such district 11 to be closed on Three King's day. 12 § 2. Section 3604 of the education law is amended by adding a new 13 subdivision 7-a to read as follows: 14 7-a. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, for purposes of any 15 calculation under subdivision seven or eight of this section, the 16 commissioner shall disregard any reduction resulting from observance of 17 Three King's day and, if necessary, such observed holiday shall be 18 calculated as a session day. 19 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred twentieth day after 20 it shall have become a law. Effective immediately the addition, amend- 21 ment and/or repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implemen- 22 tation of this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and 23 completed on or before such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00435-01-5